Utah statutes.
53A-26a-302.   Qualifications for certification.

Each applicant for certification under this chapter shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the State Board of Education;

(2)  pay a fee determined by the State Board of Education under Section 63J-1-504 to help offset the costs of implementing this chapter for the administration of examinations for certification and for the issuance of certificates;

(3)  be of good moral character; and

(4)  comply with any other qualifications for certification established by the State Board of Education pursuant to Subsection 53A-26a-202(2).



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

